California, session 20252026, AB1665.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 33315.7 is added to the Education Code, to read:33315.7. Commencing with the 2027–28 school year, a school district, county office of education, or charter school that elects to offer an athletic program, other than an interscholastic athletic program, shall ensure that the athletic program’s coaches complete an initial training, and a subsequent training every two years, that covers both of the following areas:(a) Sudden cardiac arrest as provided in Section 33479.6.(b)Pupil mental health as provided in Section 33315.8.(b) Youth athletics behavioral and mental health training aligned with the training described in Section 35179.87, as added by Assembly Bill 1626 of the 2025–26 Regular Session.SEC. 2.Section 33315.8 is added to the Education Code, to read:33315.8.(a)For purposes of this section, “school” means a public school, including a charter school, or a private school.(b)Commencing with the 2027–28 school year, a person who serves as a school coach in an athletic program, other than an interscholastic athletic program, that the governing board or body that maintains the school elects to offer shall be required to complete an initial training, and a subsequent training every two years, in a pupil mental health coaching education and training program that is approved by the department.SEC. 3.SEC. 2. Section 35179.1 of the Education Code is amended to read:35179.1. (a) This section shall be known, and may be cited, as the 1998 California High School Coaching Education and Training Program.(b) The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:(1) The exploding demand in girls athletics, and an increase in the number of pupils participating in both boys and girls athletics, are causing an increase in the number of coaches needed statewide.(2) Well-trained coaches are vital to the success of the experience of a pupil in sports and interscholastic athletic activities.(3) Improvement in coaching is a primary need identified by hundreds of principals, superintendents, and school board members who participated in the development of a strategic plan for the California Interscholastic Federation (CIF) in 1993 and 1994.(4) There are many concerns about safety, training, organization, philosophy, communications, and general management in coaching that need to be addressed.(5) It is a conservative estimate that at least 25,000 coaches annually need training and an orientation just to meet current coaching regulations contained in Title 5 of the California Code of Regulations, including basic safety and CPR requirements.(6) School districts, in conjunction with the California Interscholastic Federation, have taken the initial first steps toward building a statewide coaching education program by assembling a faculty of statewide trainers composed of school district administrators, coaches, and athletic directors using a national program being used in several states.(c) It is, therefore, the intent of the Legislature to establish a California High School Coaching Education and Training Program. It is the intent of the Legislature that the program be administered by school districts, be updated and rehearsed annually, and emphasize the following components:(1) Development of coaching philosophies consistent with school, school district, and governing board of a school district goals.(2) Sport psychology: emphasizing communication, reinforcement of the efforts of pupils, effective delivery of coaching regarding technique, and motivation of the pupil athlete.(3) Sport pedagogy: how pupil athletes learn, and how to teach sport skills.(4) Sport physiology: principles of training, fitness for sport, development of a training program, nutrition for athletes, and the harmful effects associated with the use of steroids and performance-enhancing dietary supplements by adolescents.(5) Sport management: team management, risk management, and working within the context of an entire school program.(6) Training: certification in CPR, use of an automated external defibrillator (AED), and first aid that includes, but is not limited to, training in recognizing the signs and symptoms of, and responding to, concussions, heat illness, and, by July 1, 2024, cardiac arrest. Certification in CPR and use of an AED shall be consistent with national evidence-based emergency cardiovascular care guidelines. Concussion, heat illness, and cardiac arrest training may be provided by entities offering free, online, or other types of training courses. For purposes of this section, “heat illness” includes heat cramps, heat syncope, heat exhaustion, and exertional heat stroke.(7) Pupil mental health: an age-appropriate focus on wellness, including physical and psychological wellness, indicators, causes, strategies, and helpful resources, by Commencing July 1, 2027. 2027, mental health: age appropriate training that covers all topics specified in Section 35179.85, as added by Assembly Bill 1626 of the 2025–26 Regular Session. This training may be provided by entities offering free, online, or other types of training courses.(8) Knowledge of, and adherence to, statewide rules and regulations, and school regulations, including, but not limited to, eligibility, gender equity, and discrimination.(9) Sound planning and goal setting.(d) This section does not endorse a particular coaching education or training program.SEC. 4.SEC. 3. Section 49032.1 is added to the Education Code, to read:49032.1. Commencing with the 2027–28 school year, a person who serves as a coach in an interscholastic athletic program at a high school that is a member of the California Interscholastic Federation shall be required to annually complete, complete initial training, and subsequent training every two years, before the start of the season for the high school sport in which they are authorized to coach, a pupil mental health coaching education and training program on mental health that is approved by the department and meets the components set forth in aligns with paragraph (7) of subdivision (c) of Section 35179.1.___________________ REVISIONS: Heading—Lines 4 and 5.___________________